Massachusetts, session 194th, H5154.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of chapter 145 of the resolves of 1957, as amended by
section 105 of chapter 126 of the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by inserting after the words
“Elizabeth Johnson, Jr.”, the following words:- , Margaret Jones, Alice Lake, Elizabeth Kendall,
Anne Hibbens, Goody Glover,
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of said Chapter 145 is hereby further amended by
striking the words “in the year sixteen hundred and ninety-two”.
SECTION 3. Said Chapter 145 is hereby further amended by inserting after the first
paragraph the following 2 paragraphs:-
Whereas, Hugh Parsons, Eunice Cole, and Elizabeth Morse were indicted, tried, and
found guilty of “Witchcraft”; and
of 2

Whereas, numerous others were named, accused, arrested, questioned, imprisoned,
arraigned, presented, indicted or tried for “Witchcraft” or familiarity with the Devil, though not
found guilty; and
SECTION 4. The second paragraph of said Chapter 145 is hereby amended by inserting
after the word “named”, the following words:- and other.
SECTION 5. The fourth paragraph of said Chapter 145 is hereby amended by inserting
after the words “Elizabeth Johnson, Jr.” the following words:- , Margaret Jones, Alice Lake,
Elizabeth Kendall, Anne Hibbens, Goody Glover, Hugh Parsons, Eunice Cole, Elizabeth Morse.
of 2